Ohio, session 136, SB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.451 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.451. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number thirteen between Columbus road and Beckley road, in Knox county, shall be known as the "Ohio State Highway Patrol Lt. Vance M. Andrews Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.